test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kallu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:
  Noun - kállu: # ok KALLU
    kállu+N+Sg+Nom:  kállu
    kállu+N+Sg+Gen:  kááḷu
    kállu+N+Sg+Acc:  kááḷu
    kállu+N+Sg+Ill:  kááḷun
    kállu+N+Sg+Loc:  kááḷust
    kállu+N+Sg+Com:  kálloin
    kállu+N+Sg+Abe:  káˊḷuttáá
    kállu+N+Ess:  kállun
    kállu+N+Par:  kállud
    kállu+N+Pl+Nom:  kááḷuh
    kállu+N+Pl+Gen: [kááḷui, káˊḷui]
    kállu+N+Pl+Acc:  kááḷuid
    kállu+N+Pl+Ill:  kálloid
    kállu+N+Pl+Loc:  kááḷuin
    kállu+N+Pl+Com:  káˊḷuiguin
    kállu+N+Pl+Abe:  káˊḷuittáá

  Noun - pánnu: # ok KALLU
    pánnu+N+Sg+Nom:  pánnu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Gen:  pááṇu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Acc:  pááṇu
    pánnu+N+Sg+Ill:  pááṇun
    pánnu+N+Sg+Loc:  pááṇust
    pánnu+N+Sg+Com:  pánnoin
    pánnu+N+Sg+Abe:  páṇuttáá
    pánnu+N+Ess:  pánnun
    pánnu+N+Par:  pánnud
    pánnu+N+Pl+Nom:  pááṇuh
    pánnu+N+Pl+Gen: [pááṇui, páˊṇui]
    pánnu+N+Pl+Acc:  pááṇuid
    pánnu+N+Pl+Ill:  pánnoid
    pánnu+N+Pl+Loc:  pááṇuin
    pánnu+N+Pl+Com:  páˊṇuiguin
    pánnu+N+Pl+Abe:  páˊṇuittáá

  Noun - muállu: # ok VUAGGU
    muállu+N+Sg+Nom:  muálˊlu
    muállu+N+Sg+Gen:  muáḷu
    muállu+N+Sg+Acc:  muáḷu
    muállu+N+Sg+Ill:  muáḷun
    muállu+N+Sg+Loc:  muáḷust
    muállu+N+Sg+Com:  muálˊloin
    muállu+N+Sg+Abe:  muáˊḷuttáá
    muállu+N+Ess:  muálˊlun
    muállu+N+Par:  muálˊlud
    muállu+N+Pl+Nom:  muáḷuh
    muállu+N+Pl+Gen:  [muáḷui, muáˊḷui]
    muállu+N+Pl+Acc:  muáḷuid
    muállu+N+Pl+Ill:  muálˊloid
    muállu+N+Pl+Loc:  muáḷuin
    muállu+N+Pl+Com:  muáˊluiguin
    muállu+N+Pl+Abe:  muáˊluittáá

  Noun - puállu: # ok KALLU
    puállu+N+Sg+Nom:  puálˊlu
    puállu+N+Sg+Gen:  puáḷu
    puállu+N+Sg+Acc:  puáḷu
    puállu+N+Sg+Ill:  puáḷun
    puállu+N+Sg+Loc:  puáḷust
    puállu+N+Sg+Com:  puálˊloin
    puállu+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊḷuttáá
    puállu+N+Ess:  puálˊlun
    puállu+N+Par:  puálˊlud
    puállu+N+Pl+Nom:  puáḷuh
    puállu+N+Pl+Gen:  [puáḷui, puáˊḷui]
    puállu+N+Pl+Acc:  puáḷuid
    puállu+N+Pl+Ill:  puálˊloid
    puállu+N+Pl+Loc:  puáḷuin
    puállu+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊḷuiguin
    puállu+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊḷuittáá

  Noun - juáhu: # ok LAAVU
    juáhu+N+Sg+Nom:  juáhu
    juáhu+N+Sg+Gen:  juáṿu
    juáhu+N+Sg+Ill:  juáhun
    juáhu+N+Sg+Loc:  juáṿust
    juáhu+N+Sg+Com:  juávvoin
    juáhu+N+Sg+Abe:  juáˊṿuttáá
    juáhu+N+Ess:  juáhun
    juáhu+N+Par:  juáhud
    juáhu+N+Pl+Nom:  juáṿuh
    juáhu+N+Pl+Gen: [juáṿui, juáˊvui]
    juáhu+N+Pl+Acc:  juáṿuid
    juáhu+N+Pl+Ill:  juávvoid
    juáhu+N+Pl+Loc:  juáṿuin
    juáhu+N+Pl+Com:  juáˊvuiguin
    juáhu+N+Pl+Abe:  juáˊvuittáá

  Noun - mááhu: # ok LAAVU
    mááhu+N+Sg+Nom:  mááhu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Gen:  mááṿu
    mááhu+N+Sg+Ill:  mááhun
    mááhu+N+Sg+Loc:  mááṿust
    mááhu+N+Sg+Com:  mávvoin
    mááhu+N+Sg+Abe:  máˊṿuttáá
    mááhu+N+Ess:  mááhun
    mááhu+N+Par:  mááhud
    mááhu+N+Pl+Nom:  mááṿuh
    mááhu+N+Pl+Gen: [mááṿui, máṿui]
    mááhu+N+Pl+Acc:  mááṿuid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Ill:  mávvoid
    mááhu+N+Pl+Loc:  mááṿuin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Com:  máˊṿuiguin
    mááhu+N+Pl+Abe:  máˊṿuittáá

  Noun - ruáhu: # ok KALLU
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruáhu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruáṿu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruáṿu
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruáhun
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruáṿust
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávvoin
    ruáhu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruáˊvuttáá
    ruáhu+N+Ess:  ruáhun
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruáṿuh
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Gen: [ruáṿui, ruáˊvui]
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruáṿuid
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávvoid
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruáṿuin
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Com:  ruáˊvuiguin
    ruáhu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruáˊvuittáá
